Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Promotion of Kentucky Products

148.830.
Program to promote sale of Kentucky-grown products in state resort parks — Administrative regulations.

The Department of Parks shall establish a promotion program within the Department of Parks to promote the sale of Kentucky-grown agricultural products, as defined in KRS 260.016, in state resort park restaurants, gift shops, concessions, and golf courses. The promotion program shall operate in conjunction with the Kentucky Proud™ Program in accordance with KRS 260.017. The commissioner of the Department of Parks shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the promotion program no later than October 1, 2011.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 154, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 19, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

148.832.
State resort park contracts to promote sale of Kentucky-grown products.

Any contract for the provision and sale of food services and agricultural products in state resort park restaurants, gift shops, concessions, and golf courses shall promote the sale of Kentucky-grown agricultural products under the Kentucky Proud™ Program in accordance with KRS 45A.645, 148.830, 148.835, and 260.017.

Only contracts entered into or renewed after June 8, 2011, shall be required to comply with the provisions of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 19, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

148.835.
Promotion program requiring state parks to purchase Kentucky agricultural products — Administrative regulations.

The Department of Parks shall establish a promotion program within the Department of Parks to require that if purchasing agricultural products, state parks purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products if the purchasing officer determines that they are available, can be priced on the menu to encourage their sale, and meet the quality standards set by the Department of Parks. The commissioner of the Department of Parks shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the promotion program as set forth in this section no later than October 1, 2011.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 4, effective April 23, 2002; 2011, ch. 19, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

148.840.
Steering committee to assist in promotion — Recommendation — Reports — Termination.

The Department of Parks shall establish a steering committee which shall consist of:

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or a designee;

The Commissioner of Agriculture, or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Parks, or a designee;

The director of the Agriculture Development Board, or a designee;

The coordinator of the Kentucky State University Aquaculture Program, or a designee;

The chairperson of the horticulture department at the University of Kentucky, or a designee; and

Two (2) members of organizations and associations representing the Kentucky farming community, appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

The steering committee shall plan and assist in the implementation of the promotion program identified in KRS 148.830 and 148.835.

The steering committee shall recommend by October 1, 2011, the structure and objectives of the promotion program identified in KRS 148.830 and 148.835.

Upon implementation of the promotion program identified in KRS 148.830 and 148.835, the steering committee shall evaluate the promotion program and submit an initial report to the Governor, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the Legislative Research Commission no later than July 1, 2012, and subsequent annual reports no later than July 1 of each year thereafter.

The steering committee shall continue to meet at least once each year at a date and location to be determined by its members to ensure the continuation of the promotion program.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2011, ch. 19, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.